Hawaii statutes.
§463-9 Form of application for license or
registration. [Repeal and reenactment on July 1, 2016. L 2010, c 208,
§8.] Application for a license or registration shall be made on a form
prescribed by the board which may require a statement of the applicant's full
name, age, date and place of birth, residence and business address, the
business or occupation the applicant has engaged in for ten years immediately
preceding the date of the filing of the application with names and addresses of
employers, the date and place of any arrest or conviction of a crime where
there has not been any order annulling or expunging the sentence or of any
offense involving moral turpitude, whether the applicant has received treatment
for any psychiatric or psychological disorder, or whether the treatment has
ever been recommended, and such information, including fingerprints of the
applicant and such other information as the board may require to investigate
the character, competency, and integrity of the applicant. The board shall
conduct such investigation of the applicant's background, character,
competency, and integrity as it deems appropriate, and shall request, in
accordance with section 846‑2.7, criminal history records of the
applicant from each jurisdiction in which the application form indicates the
applicant lived for any substantial period of time. The Hawaii criminal
justice data center shall provide such information on request to the director
of commerce and consumer affairs. [L 1961, c 77, pt of §1; Supp, §165A-9; HRS
§463-9; am L 1983, c 40, §7; am L 1987, c 57, §5; am L 1992, c 202, §149; am L
1997, c 40, §17; am L 2003, c 95, §13; am L 2010, c 208, §4]

Note

Repeal and reenactment on July 1, 2016, by L 2010, c 208, §8
deleted by L 2014, c 94, §3.

Previous
Vol10_Ch0436-0474
Next